test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NA_VW_NoExtra_anini_gt-norm.yaml
     +Px2anini+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: gianiniiminaanibanag
     +Px2anini+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: gianiniiminaanibaning
     +Px2anini+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: gianiniiminaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px2anini+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: gianiniiminaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2anini+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: gianiniiminaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2anini+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Obv: gianiniimiwaaibanan
     +Px2anini+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: gianiniimiwaaibanag
     +Px2anini+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: gianiniimiwaaibaning
     +Px2anini+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: gianiniimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px2anini+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: gianiniimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2anini+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: gianiniimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2anini+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: gianiniiminiibanan
     +Px2anini+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Pl: gianiniiminiibanag
     +Px2anini+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: gianiniiminiibaning
     +Px2anini+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: gianiniimini***idig, idog***an
     +Px2anini+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: gianiniimini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2anini+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: gianiniimini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3anini+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: oaniniiminaanibanan
     +Px3anini+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: oaniniiminaanibanag
     +Px3anini+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: oaniniiminaanibaning
     +Px3anini+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: oaniniiminaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px3anini+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: oaniniiminaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3anini+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: oaniniiminaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3anini+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Obv: oaniniimiwaaibanan
     +Px3anini+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: oaniniimiwaaibanag
     +Px3anini+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: oaniniimiwaaibaning
     +Px3anini+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: oaniniimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px3anini+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: oaniniimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3anini+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: oaniniimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3anini+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: oaniniiminiibanan
     +Px3anini+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Pl: oaniniiminiibanag
     +Px3anini+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: oaniniiminiibaning
     +Px3anini+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: oaniniimini***idig, idog***an
     +Px3anini+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: oaniniimini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3anini+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: oaniniimini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5, 6, 7
     +Px1anini+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: nianiniishinaanibanan
     +Px1anini+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: nianiniishinaanibanag
     +Px1anini+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: nianiniishinaanibaning
     +Px1anini+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: nianiniishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px1anini+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: nianiniishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1anini+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: nianiniishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1anini+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: nianiniishiwaaibanan
     +Px1anini+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: nianiniishiwaaibanag
     +Px1anini+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: nianiniishiwaaibaning
     +Px1anini+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: nianiniishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px1anini+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: nianiniishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1anini+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: nianiniishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1anini+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: nianiniishiniibanan
     +Px1anini+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: nianiniishiniibanag
     +Px1anini+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: nianiniishiniibaning
     +Px1anini+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: nianiniishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px1anini+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: nianiniishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1anini+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: nianiniishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2anini+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: gianiniishinaanibanan
     +Px2anini+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: gianiniishinaanibanag
     +Px2anini+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: gianiniishinaanibaning
     +Px2anini+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: gianiniishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px2anini+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: gianiniishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2anini+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: gianiniishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2anini+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: gianiniishiwaaibanan
     +Px2anini+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: gianiniishiwaaibanag
     +Px2anini+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: gianiniishiwaaibaning
     +Px2anini+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: gianiniishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px2anini+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: gianiniishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2anini+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: gianiniishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2anini+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: gianiniishiniibanan
     +Px2anini+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: gianiniishiniibanag
     +Px2anini+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: gianiniishiniibaning
     +Px2anini+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: gianiniishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px2anini+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: gianiniishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2anini+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: gianiniishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3anini+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: oaniniishinaanibanan
     +Px3anini+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: oaniniishinaanibanag
     +Px3anini+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: oaniniishinaanibaning
     +Px3anini+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: oaniniishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px3anini+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: oaniniishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3anini+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: oaniniishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3anini+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: oaniniishiwaaibanan
     +Px3anini+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: oaniniishiwaaibanag
     +Px3anini+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: oaniniishiwaaibaning
     +Px3anini+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: oaniniishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px3anini+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: oaniniishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3anini+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: oaniniishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3anini+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: oaniniishiniibanan
     +Px3anini+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: oaniniishiniibanag
     +Px3anini+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: oaniniishiniibaning
     +Px3anini+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: oaniniishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px3anini+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: oaniniishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3anini+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: oaniniishini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 5, 6
     anini+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: aniniensimishinaaniban
     anini+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: aniniensimishinaan***idig, idog***
     anini+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: aniniensimishiwaaiban
     anini+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: aniniensimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     anini+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: aniniensimishiniiban
     anini+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: aniniensimishini***idig, idog***
     anini+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: aninienhimishinaaniban
     anini+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: aninienhimishinaan***idig, idog***
     anini+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: aninienhimishiwaaiban
     anini+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: aninienhimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     anini+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: aninienhimishiniiban
     anini+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: aninienhimishini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 5, 7
     anini+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: aniniensimishinaanan
     anini+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: aniniensimishinaanag
     anini+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: aniniensimishinaaning
     anini+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Obv: aniniensimishiwaaan
     anini+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pl: aniniensimishiwaaag
     anini+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Loc: aniniensimishiwaaing
     anini+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Obv: aniniensimishinian
     anini+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pl: aniniensimishiniag
     anini+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Loc: aniniensimishiniing
     anini+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: aninienhimishinaanan
     anini+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: aninienhimishinaanag
     anini+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: aninienhimishinaaning
     anini+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Obv: aninienhimishiwaaan
     anini+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pl: aninienhimishiwaaag
     anini+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Loc: aninienhimishiwaaing
     anini+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Obv: aninienhimishinian
     anini+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pl: aninienhimishiniag
     anini+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Loc: aninienhimishiniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 6, 7
     anini+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: aniniensimishibanan
     anini+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: aniniensimishibanag
     anini+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: aniniensimishibaning
     anini+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Obv: aniniensimish***idig, idog***an
     anini+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Pl: aniniensimish***idig, idog***ag
     anini+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Loc: aniniensimish***idig, idog***ing
     anini+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: aninienhimishibanan
     anini+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: aninienhimishibanag
     anini+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: aninienhimishibaning
     anini+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Obv: aninienhimish***idig, idog***an
     anini+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Pl: aninienhimish***idig, idog***ag
     anini+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Loc: aninienhimish***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 5, 6, 7
     anini+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: aniniensiminaanibanan
     anini+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: aniniensiminaanibanag
     anini+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: aniniensiminaanibaning
     anini+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: aniniensiminaan***idig, idog***an
     anini+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: aniniensiminaan***idig, idog***ag
     anini+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: aniniensiminaan***idig, idog***ing
     anini+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Obv: aniniensimiwaaibanan
     anini+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: aniniensimiwaaibanag
     anini+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: aniniensimiwaaibaning
     anini+Dim+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: aniniensimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     anini+Dim+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: aniniensimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     anini+Dim+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: aniniensimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     anini+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: aniniensiminiibanan
     anini+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Pl: aniniensiminiibanag
     anini+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: aniniensiminiibaning
     anini+Dim+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: aniniensimini***idig, idog***an
     anini+Dim+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: aniniensimini***idig, idog***ag
     anini+Dim+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: aniniensimini***idig, idog***ing
     anini+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: aninienhiminaanibanan
     anini+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: aninienhiminaanibanag
     anini+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: aninienhiminaanibaning
     anini+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: aninienhiminaan***idig, idog***an
     anini+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: aninienhiminaan***idig, idog***ag
     anini+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: aninienhiminaan***idig, idog***ing
     anini+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Obv: aninienhimiwaaibanan
     anini+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: aninienhimiwaaibanag
     anini+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: aninienhimiwaaibaning
     anini+Con+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: aninienhimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     anini+Con+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: aninienhimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     anini+Con+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: aninienhimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     anini+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: aninienhiminiibanan
     anini+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Pl: aninienhiminiibanag
     anini+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: aninienhiminiibaning
     anini+Con+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: aninienhimini***idig, idog***an
     anini+Con+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: aninienhimini***idig, idog***ag
     anini+Con+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: aninienhimini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 5, 6, 7
     anini+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: aniniensishinaanibanan
     anini+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: aniniensishinaanibanag
     anini+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: aniniensishinaanibaning
     anini+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: aniniensishinaan***idig, idog***an
     anini+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: aniniensishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     anini+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: aniniensishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     anini+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: aniniensishiwaaibanan
     anini+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: aniniensishiwaaibanag
     anini+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: aniniensishiwaaibaning
     anini+Dim+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: aniniensishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     anini+Dim+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: aniniensishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     anini+Dim+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: aniniensishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     anini+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: aniniensishiniibanan
     anini+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: aniniensishiniibanag
     anini+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: aniniensishiniibaning
     anini+Dim+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: aniniensishini***idig, idog***an
     anini+Dim+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: aniniensishini***idig, idog***ag
     anini+Dim+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: aniniensishini***idig, idog***ing
     anini+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: aninienhishinaanibanan
     anini+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: aninienhishinaanibanag
     anini+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: aninienhishinaanibaning
